Utah statutes.
59-22-304.   Released claims.

(1)  "Released Claims," which is referenced in Subsection 59-22-202(7), is defined in the Master Settlement Agreement as follows:

""Released Claims" means:

(1)  for past conduct, acts or omissions, including any damages incurred in the future arising from such past conduct, acts or omissions, those Claims directly or indirectly based on, arising out of or in any way related, in whole or in part, to (A) the use, sale, distribution, manufacture, development, advertising, marketing or health effects of, (B) the exposure to, or (C) research, statements, or warnings regarding, Tobacco Products, including, but not limited to, the Claims asserted in the actions identified in Exhibit D, or any comparable Claims that were, could be or could have been asserted now or in the future in those actions or in any comparable action in federal, state or local court brought by a Settling State or a Releasing Party, whether or not such Settling State or Releasing Party has brought such action, except for claims not asserted in the actions identified in Exhibit D for outstanding liability under existing licensing, or similar, fee laws or existing tax laws, but not excepting claims for any tax liability of the Tobacco-Related Organizations or of any Released Party with respect to such Tobacco-Related Organizations, which claims are covered by the release and covenants set forth in this Agreement;

(2)  for future conduct, acts or omissions, only those monetary Claims directly or indirectly based on, arising out of or in any way related to, in whole or in part, the use of or exposure to Tobacco Products manufactured in the ordinary course of business, including without limitation any future Claims for reimbursement of health care costs allegedly associated with the use of or exposure to Tobacco Products."

(2)  Exhibit D is a list of the titles and docket numbers of the lawsuits brought by states against tobacco manufacturers and the courts in which those lawsuits were filed as of the date that the Master Settlement Agreement was entered into.

